en: Whole-grain oat rings, Wholemeal oat rings
sv: Fullkornshavreringar, Havreringar av fullkorn

en: Plain oat rings
sv: Naturelle havreringar, Havreringar naturell

en: Flavoured oat rings
sv: Havreringar med smak

en: Cereals with nuts
fr: Céréales aux fruits à coques
hr: Žitarice s orasima
lt: Sausi pusryčiai su riešutais
nl: Ontbijtgranen met noten

en: Cereals with fruits
de: Frühstückscerealien mit Früchten
es: Cereales con frutas
fi: Viljat hedelmillä
fr: Céréales aux fruits
hr: Žitarice s voćem
it: cereali con frutta
lt: Javainiai su vaisiais
pt: Cereais com frutos

en: Cereal flakes with fruits
fr: Pétales de céréales aux fruits
hr: Žitne pahuljice s voćem
it: Fiocchi di cereali con frutta
lt: Javų dribsniai su vaisiais
pt: Flocos de cereais com frutos

en: Cereal flakes with nuts, Wheat flakes with almonds fortified with vitamins and chemical elements, Wheat flakes with hazelnuts fortified with vitamins and chemical elements, Wheat flakes with walnuts fortified with vitamins and chemical elements
fr: Pétales de céréales aux fruits à coques, Pétales de blé avec amandes enrichis en vitamines et minéraux, Pétales de blé avec noix enrichis en vitamines et minéraux, Pétales de blé avec noisettes enrichis en vitamines et minéraux
hr: Žitne pahuljice s orašastim plodovima
pt: Flocos de cereais com nozes

en: Chocolate cereals, Cereals with chocolate
de: Schokoflocken, Schokoladenflocken
es: Cereales de chocolate
fi: Suklaa-aamiaismurot
fr: Céréales au chocolat
hr: Čokoladne pahuljice
it: Cereali al cioccolato
lt: Šokoladiniai javainiai
nl: Ontbijtgranen met chocola
pt: Cereais de chocolate

en: Cereal flakes with chocolate
es: Copos de cereales con chocolate, Cereales con chocolate
fr: Pétales de céréales au chocolat
hr: Žitne pahuljice s čokoladom
lt: Javų dribsniai su šokoladu
pt: Flocos de cereais com chocolate

en: Cereals with caramel
es: Cereales con caramelo
fi: aamiaismurot kinuskilla
fr: Céréales au caramel
hr: Žitarice s karamelom
it: Cereali al caramello
lt: Javainiai su karamele
nl: Ontbijtgranen met caramel
pt: Cereais com caramelo

en: Cereals with honey
de: Honigflocken
es: Cereales con miel
fi: aamiaismurot hunajan kera
fr: Céréales au miel
hr: Žitarice s medom
it: Cereali al miele
lt: Javainiai su medumi
nl: Ontbijtgranen met honing
pt: Cereais com mel

en: Filled cereals
de: Gefüllte Cerealien
es: Cereales rellenos
fi: täytetyt aamiaismurot
fr: Céréales fourrées
hr: Punjene žitarice
it: Cereali ripieni
lt: Sausi pusryčiai su įdaru
nl: Gevulde ontbijtgranen

en: Diet chocolate breakfast cereals
fr: Céréales au chocolat pour petit-déjeuner équilibré
hr: Dijetne čokoladne žitarice za doručak
lt: Dietiniai šokoladiniai sausi pusryčiai

en: Breakfast cereals fortified with vitamins and chemical elements
fr: Céréales pour petit déjeuner enrichies en vitamines et minéraux
hr: Žitarice za doručak obogaćene vitaminima i kemijskim elementima
lt: Sausi pusryčiai praturtinti vitaminais ir mineralais
nl: Ontbijtgranen verrijkt met vitaminen en mineralen

en: Breakfast cereals not fortified with vitamins and chemical elements
fr: Céréales pour petit déjeuner non enrichies en vitamines et minéraux
hr: Žitarice za doručak koje nisu obogaćene vitaminima i kemijskim elementima
lt: Sausi pusryčiai nepraturtintais vitaminais ir mineralais
nl: Ontbijtgranen onverrijkt met vitaminen en mineralen

en: Chocolate wheat shells, chocolate wheat flakes, Breakfast chocolate cereals with wheat grain flakes
fr: Pétales de blé chocolatés
hr: Čokoladne pšenične ljuske
it: Petali di Frumento al cacao
lt: Sausi pusryčiai šokoladinės kriauklelės

en: Breakfast chocolate cereals with wheat grain flakes not fortified with vitamins and chemical elements
fr: Pétales de blé chocolatés non enrichis en vitamines et minéraux
hr: Čokoladne pahuljice za doručak s pahuljicama pšeničnog zrna koje nisu obogaćene vitaminima i kemijskim elementima
lt: Šokoladiniai dribsniai su kviečių grūdų dribsniais nepraturtintais vitaminais ir mineralais

en: Chocolate wheat grain flakes fortified with vitamins and chemical elements
fr: Pétales de blé chocolatés enrichis en vitamines et minéraux

en: Breakfast chocolate cereals not filled and not fortified with vitamins and chemical elements
fr: Céréales chocolatées pour petit-déjeuner non fourrées et non enrichies en vitamines et minéraux

en: Diet chocolate breakfast cereals fortified with vitamins and chemical elements
fr: Céréales au chocolat pour petit-déjeuner équilibré enrichies en vitamines et minéraux